Maryland, session 2026, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(o) “Recovery residence” means a service that:
(1) Provides alcohol–free and illicit–drug–free housing to individuals with
substance–related disorders or addictive disorders or co–occurring mental disorders and
substance–related disorders or addictive disorders; and
(2) Does not include clinical treatment services.
19–2501.
– 1 –

Ch. 793 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certificate of compliance” means a certificate that is issued to a recovery
residence by a credentialing entity.
(c) “Certified recovery residence” means a recovery residence that holds a
certificate of compliance.
(d) “Credentialing entity” means a nonprofit organization that develops and
administers professional certification programs according to nationally recognized
certification standards.
(e) “Recovery residence” has the meaning stated in § 7.5–101 of this article.
19–2502.
(a) The Department shall approve a credentialing entity to develop and
administer a certification process for recovery residences.
(b) The credentialing entity shall:
(1) [Establish] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
ESTABLISH recovery residence certification requirements;
(2) Establish processes to administer the application, certification, and
recertification process;
(3) Establish processes to monitor and inspect a recovery residence;
(4) Conduct an on–site inspection of a recovery residence:
(i) Before issuing a certificate of compliance; and
(ii) At least once during each certification renewal period; and
(5) Issue a certificate of compliance on approval of the application process
and the inspection of the recovery residence.
(c) THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY A CREDENTIALING ENTITY
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION SHALL PROHIBIT A CERTIFIED
RECOVERY RESIDENCE FROM:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 793
(1) REFUSING SERVICES TO AN INDIVIDUAL BASED ON THE
INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT FOR OPIOID USE
DISORDER; AND
(2) REQUIRING AN INDIVIDUAL TO CEASE RECEIVING OR MODIFY
HOW THE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES MEDICATION–ASSISTED TREATMENT FOR OPIOID
USE DISORDER BEFORE THE INDIVIDUAL MAY RECEIVE SERVICES AT THE RECOVERY
RESIDENCE.
(D) A certificate of compliance issued by the credentialing entity is valid for 1 year
from the date of issuance.
[(d)] (E) The credentialing entity may revoke the certificate of compliance of a
certified recovery residence if the credentialing entity finds that the recovery residence is
not in compliance with the requirements established by the credentialing entity.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –